Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.430

Unlawful to act as salesperson without registering—Exemptions.

Unless the transaction is exempt under RCW 19.105.325, it is unlawful for any person to act as a camping resort salesperson in this state without first registering under this chapter as a salesperson or being licensed as a salesperson under chapter 18.85 RCW or a broker licensed under that chapter.

[ 1988 c 159 s 20; 1982 c 69 s 14.]